Maryland, session 2025, HB0758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0758*

HOUSE BILL 758
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) A speed monitoring system may not be used in a local jurisdiction
under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(x) 1. A local jurisdiction that authorizes a program of speed
monitoring systems shall designate an official or employee to investigate and respond to
questions or concerns about the local jurisdiction’s speed monitoring system program.
2. A. The local designee shall review a citation generated
by a speed monitoring system if the person who received the citation requests review before
the deadline for contesting liability under this section.
B. [If the local designee determines that the citation is an
erroneous violation, the] THE local designee shall void the citation IF THE LOCAL
DESIGNEE DETERMINES THAT:
I. THE CITATION INVOLVES AN ERRONEOUS VIOLATION;
OR
II. THE MOTOR VEHICLE SUBJECT TO THE CITATION OR
ITS REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN AND THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE NOT IN THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE PERSON
WHO RECEIVED THE CITATION AT THE TIME THE ALLEGED VIOLATION OCCURRED.
C. If the local designee determines that a person did not
receive notice of a citation issued under this section due to an administrative error, the
local designee may resend the citation in accordance with subsection (d) of this section or
void the citation.
D. A local designee that takes any action described under
subsubsubparagraph C of this subsubparagraph shall notify the Administration of the
action for the purpose of rescinding any administrative penalties imposed under subsection
(g) of this section.
E. A local designee may not determine that a citation is an
erroneous violation based solely on the dismissal of the citation by a court.

HOUSE BILL 758 3
3. A local designee may not be employed by a speed
monitoring system contractor or have been involved in any review of a speed monitoring
system citation, other than review of a citation under this subparagraph.
4. On receipt of a written question or concern from a person,
the local designee shall provide a written answer or response to the person within a
reasonable time.
5. A local jurisdiction shall make any written questions or
concerns received under this subparagraph and any subsequent written answers or
responses available for public inspection.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(d) (1) Subject to [the provisions of] paragraphs (2) through [(4)] (5) AND (7)
of this subsection, an agency shall mail to an owner liable under subsection (c) of this
section a citation that shall include:
(i) The name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;
(ii) The registration number of the motor vehicle involved in the
violation;
(iii) The violation charged;
(iv) The location where the violation occurred;
(v) The date and time of the violation;
(vi) A copy of the recorded image;
(vii) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which
the civil penalty should be paid;
(viii) A signed statement by a duly authorized law enforcement officer
employed by or under contract with an agency that, based on inspection of recorded images,
the motor vehicle was being operated in violation of this subtitle;
(ix) A statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of
this subtitle;
(x) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section of the manner and time in which liability as alleged in the citation may be contested
in the District Court; and

HOUSE BILL 758
(xi) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section that failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability in a timely manner:
1. Is an admission of liability;
2. May result in the refusal by the Administration to register
the motor vehicle; and
3. May result in the suspension of the motor vehicle
registration.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, an
agency may mail a warning notice instead of a citation to the owner liable under subsection
(c) of this section.
(ii) With regard to a speed monitoring system established on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, an agency shall mail a warning notice instead of a citation
for a violation recorded by the speed monitoring system during the first 90 days that the
speed monitoring system is in operation.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (f)(4) of this section, an agency may
not mail a citation to a person who is not an owner.
(4) Except as provided in subsections (b)(1)(x) and (f)(4) of this section, a
citation issued under this section shall be mailed no later than 2 weeks after the alleged
violation if the vehicle is registered in this State, and 30 days after the alleged violation if
the vehicle is registered in another state.
(5) AN AGENCY MAY NOT ISSUE OR MAIL A CITATION UNTIL THE
AGENCY CONFIRMS THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE INVOLVED IN THE ALLEGED
VIOLATION OR ITS REGISTRATION PLATES WERE NOT REPORTED AS STOLEN.
(6) A person who receives a citation under paragraph (1) of this subsection
may:
(i) Pay the civil penalty, in accordance with instructions on the
citation, directly to the political subdivision; [or]
(ii) REQUEST REVIEW BY A LOCAL DESIGNEE UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1)(X) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(III) Elect to stand trial in the District Court for the alleged violation.
[(6)] (7) To mail the citation or warning notice, an agency shall use:

HOUSE BILL 758 5
(i) The current mailing address on file with the Administration; or
(ii) If a mailing address is unavailable, the current residential
address on file with the Administration.
(f) (1) The District Court may consider in defense of a violation:
(i) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, that the motor vehicle
or the registration plates of the motor vehicle were stolen before the violation occurred and
were not under the control or possession of the owner at the time of the violation;
(2) To demonstrate that the motor vehicle or the registration plates were
stolen before the violation occurred and were not under the control or possession of the
owner at the time of the violation, the owner shall submit proof that a police report
regarding the stolen motor vehicle or registration plates SHOWING EXCULPATORY
EVIDENCE was filed in a timely manner.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.